Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3811
Prepaid dental service plan; code of ethics; violation; director; duties.

The director shall report to the president of the Nebraska Dental Association, or to any person designated by the Nebraska Dental Association to receive grievances concerning dentists from the public, any information of possible violations of the code of ethics by dentists who provide services in connection with a prepaid dental service plan.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 11.